Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216.13, is amended to read: 216.13 COMMENCING PROCEEDINGS BEFORE COMMISSION. Proceedings before the commission deleted text begin against any such carrier or public warehouse operatordeleted text end shall be instituted by new text begin a new text end complaintdeleted text begin , verified as a pleading in a civil action, statingdeleted text end new text begin or petition that states new text end in ordinary language the facts constituting the alleged omission or offensenew text begin or action requested. The filer must provide notice to the affected utilitiesnew text end . deleted text begin The parties to such proceedings shall be termed, respectively, "complainant" and "respondent."deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216.16, is amended to read: 216.16 HEARINGS BEFORE COMMISSION. If the deleted text begin matter bedeleted text end new text begin complaint or petition isnew text end not adjusted to the satisfaction of the commission, deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the commissionnew text end shall set a time and place of hearing, and give at least ten days' notice thereof to each party. The parties may appear either in person or by attorney. The commission shall hear evidence and otherwise investigate the matter, make findings of fact upon all matters involved, and such order or recommendation deleted text begin in the premisesdeleted text end as may be just. A copy of such findings and order or recommendation shall forthwith be served upon each party. No proceedings shall be dismissed on account of want of pecuniary interest in the complaint. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216.161, is amended to read: 216.161 CONTESTED CASES; NOTICE. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law the commission in any contested case shall give reasonable notice to representatives of associations or other interested groups or persons who have registered their names with the new text begin executive new text end secretary of the commission for that purpose, to all parties and to cities and municipalities which the commission deems to be interested in the proceeding. The commission may prescribe an annual fee to be paid into the state treasury which shall be a charge to all registered groups or persons. This charge is to cover the costs involved. "Contested case" deleted text begin means a proceeding before the commission in which the legal rights, duties or privileges of specific parties are required by law or constitutional right to be determined after a hearingdeleted text end new text begin has the meaning given in section 14.02, subdivision 3new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216.17, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Filings with commission; manner of filing. deleted text begin As of January 1, 2008,deleted text end Any telephone company or telecommunications carrier subject to chapter 237; any public utility, cooperative association, or municipal utility subject to chapter 216B; and state agencies, shall file documents with the commission via the commission's electronic filing system. The executive secretary may approve an exemption from this requirement if an affected company or agency is unable to submit filings via the commission's electronic filing system. All parties, participants, or other interested persons shall submit filings to the commission via the commission's electronic filing system whenever practicable, but may also file by personal delivery or by mail. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216A.01, is amended to read: 216A.01 DEPARTMENT AND COMMISSION; POWERS AND DUTIES. The Department of Commerce shall have and possess all of the rights and powers and perform all of the duties vested in it by this chapter. The Public Utilities Commission shall have and possess all of the rights and powers and perform all of the duties vested in it by deleted text begin this chapter and those formerly vested by law in the Railroad and Warehouse Commissiondeleted text end new text begin chapters 216, 216A, 216B, 216C, 216G, 216H, 216I, and 237new text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216A.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members. The Public Utilities Commission shall consist of five members. The terms of members shall be six years and until their successors have been appointed and qualified. Each commissioner shall be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate. Not more than three commissioners shall belong to the same political party. At least one commissioner must have been domiciled at the time of appointment outside the seven-county metropolitan area. deleted text begin If the membership of the commission after July 31, 1986, does not consist of at least one member domiciled at the time of appointment outside the seven-county metropolitan area, the membership shall conform to this requirement following normal attrition of the present commissioners.deleted text end The governor when selecting commissioners shall give consideration to persons learned in the law or persons who have engaged in the profession of engineering, public accounting, property and utility valuation, finance, physical or natural sciences, production agriculture, or natural resources as well as being representative of the general public. For purposes of this subdivision, "seven-county metropolitan area" means Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington Counties. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216A.03, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Record of proceedings. An audio deleted text begin magnetic or audio electronicdeleted text end new text begin or videonew text end recording device shall be used to keep a record of all proceedings before the commission. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216A.05, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Powers generally. The commission shall, to the extent prescribed by law: (1) investigate the management of deleted text begin all warehouse operators and telegraph companiesdeleted text end new text begin entities within its jurisdictionnew text end , the manner in which their businesses are conducted and the adequacies of the services which they are affording to the public, and make all appropriate orders relating to the continuation, termination, or modification of all services and facilities deleted text begin with a view to properly promotingdeleted text end new text begin necessary to ensurenew text end the security and convenience of the public; (2) review and ascertain the reasonableness of tariffs of rates, fares, and charges, or any part or classification thereof, and prescribe the form and manner of filing, posting, and publication thereof; (3) prescribe uniform systems of keeping and rendering accounts and the time within which such systems shall be adopted; (4) order the issuance of franchises, permits or certificates of deleted text begin convenience and necessitydeleted text end new text begin neednew text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.027, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Optional referendum. No cooperative shall be bound by the provisions of this section unless adoption has been approved at referendum using the petition and election procedures in section 216B.026. deleted text begin Within 60 days of May 19, 1983, the board of directors of each cooperative electric association shall notify the stockholders of the provisions of this section and shall explain the process for ratification by petition and election as provided in this subdivision.deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.06, is amended to read: 216B.06 RECEIVING DIFFERENT COMPENSATION. No public utility shall directly or indirectly, by any device whatsoever, or in any manner, charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or less compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered by the utility than that prescribed in the schedules of rates of the public utility applicable thereto when filed in the manner provided in Laws 1974, chapter 429, nor shall any person knowingly receive or accept any service from a public utility for a compensation greater or less than that prescribed in the schedulesdeleted text begin , provided that all rates being charged and collected by a public utility upon January 1, 1975, may be continued until schedules are fileddeleted text end . Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.098, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Budget billing plans. A utility shall offer a customer a budget billing plan for payment of charges for service, including adequate notice to customers prior to changing budget payment amounts. Municipal utilities having 3,000 or fewer customers are exempt from this requirement. deleted text begin Municipal utilities having more than 3,000 customers shall implement this requirement before July 1, 2003.deleted text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.16, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Multiyear rate plan. (a) A public utility may propose, and the commission may approve, approve as modified, or reject, a multiyear rate plan as provided in this subdivision. The term "multiyear rate plan" refers to a plan establishing the rates the utility may charge for each year of the specified period of years, which cannot exceed five years, to be covered by the plan. A utility proposing a multiyear rate plan shall provide a general description of the utility's major planned investments over the plan period. The commission may also require the utility to provide a set of reasonable performance measures and incentives that are quantifiable, verifiable, and consistent with state energy policies. The commission may allow the utility to adjust recovery of its cost of capital or other costs in a reasonable manner within the plan period. The utility may propose: (1) recovery of the utility's forecasted rate base, based on a formula, a budget forecast, or a fixed escalation rate, individually or in combination. The forecasted rate base must include the utility's planned capital investments and investment-related costs, including income tax impacts, depreciation, and property taxes, as well as forecasted capacity-related costs from purchased power agreements that are not recovered through subdivision 7; (2) recovery of operations and maintenance expenses, based on an electricity-related price index or other formula; (3) tariffs that expand the products and services available to customers, including, but not limited to, an affordability rate for low-income residential customers; and (4) adjustments to the rates approved under the multiyear plan for rate changes that the commission determines to be just and reasonable, including, but not limited to, changes in the utility's cost of operating its nuclear facilities, or other significant investments not addressed in the plan. (b) A utility that has filed a petition with the commission to approve a multiyear rate plan may request to be allowed to implement interim rates for the first and second years of the multiyear plan. If the commission approves the request, interim rates shall be implemented in the same manner as allowed under subdivision 3. (c) The commission may approve a multiyear rate plan only if it finds that the plan establishes just and reasonable rates for the utility, applying the factors described in subdivision 6. Consistent with subdivision 4, the burden of proof to demonstrate that the multiyear rate plan is just and reasonable is on the public utility proposing the plan. (d) Rates charged under the multiyear rate plan must be based only upon the utility's reasonable and prudent costs of service over the term of the plan, as determined by the commission, provided that the costs are not being recovered elsewhere in rates. Rate adjustments authorized under subdivisions 6b and 7 may continue outside of a plan authorized under this subdivision. (e) The commission may, by order, establish terms, conditions, and procedures for a multiyear rate plan necessary to implement this section and ensure that rates remain just and reasonable during the course of the plan, including terms and procedures for rate adjustment. At any time prior to conclusion of a multiyear rate plan, the commission, upon its own motion or upon petition of any party, has the discretion to examine the reasonableness of the utility's rates under the plan, and adjust rates as necessary. (f) In reviewing a multiyear rate plan proposed in a general rate case under this section, the commission may extend the time requirements for issuance of a final determination prescribed in this section by an additional 90 days beyond its existing authority under subdivision 2, paragraph (f). deleted text begin (g) A utility may not file a multiyear rate plan that would establish rates under the terms of the plan until after May 31, 2012. deleted text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g) new text end The commission may initiate a proceeding to determine a set of performance measures that can be used to assess a utility operating under a multiyear rate plan. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1611, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Project information. (a) deleted text begin Beginning July 1, 2014,deleted text end Each electric utility shall request an applicant for interconnection of distributed renewable energy generation to provide the following information, in a format prescribed by the commissioner: (1) the nameplate capacity of the facility in the application; (2) the preincentive installed cost and cost components of the generation system at the facility; (3) the energy source of the facility; and (4) the zip code in which the facility is to be located. (b) The commissioner shall develop or identify a system to collect and process the information under this subdivision for each utility, and make non-project-specific data available to the public on a periodic basis as determined by the commissioner, and in a format determined by the commissioner. The commissioner may solicit proposals from outside parties to develop the system. The commissioner may only collect data authorized in paragraph (a), and may not require submission of any additional data that could be used to personally identify any individual applicant or utility customer. (c) Electric utilities collecting and transferring data under this subdivision are not responsible for the accuracy, completeness, or quality of the information under this subdivision. (d) Except as provided in paragraph (b), any information provided by an applicant to the commissioner under this subdivision is nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.2412, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Decoupling plans. new text end new text begin A public utility may file a decoupling plan. The commission may approve, deny, or modify the decoupling plan consistent with the public interest. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.2422, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Environmental costs. (a) The commission shall, to the extent practicable, quantify and establish a range of environmental costs associated with each method of electricity generation. A utility shall use the values established by the commission in conjunction with other external factors, including socioeconomic costs, when evaluating and selecting resource options in all proceedings before the commission, including resource plan and certificate of need proceedings. (b) The commission shall provisionally adopt and apply the draft cost of greenhouse gas emissions valuations presented in the United States Environmental Protection Agency's EPA External Review Draft of Report on the Social Cost of Greenhouse Gases: Estimates Incorporating Recent Scientific Advances, released in September 2022, including the time horizon, global estimates of damages, and the full range of discount rates from 2.5 to 1.5 percent, with two percent as the central estimate. The commission shall adopt the estimates contained in the final version of the external review draft report when it becomes available. (c) If, at any time, the estimates adopted by the commission under paragraph (a) are exceeded by estimates released by the federal Interagency Working Group on the Social Cost of Greenhouse Gases or its successors, the commission shall adopt the working group estimates. deleted text begin (d) The commission shall establish interim environmental cost values associated with each method of electricity generation by March 1, 1994. These values expire on the date the commission establishes environmental cost values under paragraph (a). deleted text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.27, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applying for rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end . Within 20 days after the service by the commission of any decision constituting an order or determination, any party to the proceeding and any other person, aggrieved by the decision and directly affected thereby, may apply to the commission for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end in respect to any matters determined in the decision. The commission may grant and hold a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end on the matters, or upon any of them as it may specify in the order granting the rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end , if in its judgment sufficient reason therefor exists. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.27, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Contents of application; condition precedent for review. The application for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end shall set forth specifically the grounds on which the applicant contends the decision is unlawful or unreasonable. No cause of action arising out of any decision constituting an order or determination of the commission or any proceeding for the judicial review thereof shall accrue in any court to any person or corporation unless the plaintiff or petitioner in the action or proceeding within 20 days after the service of the decision, shall have made application to the commission for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end in the proceeding in which the decision was made. No person or corporation shall in any court urge or rely on any ground not so set forth in the application for rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end . Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.27, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rules; procedural requirements; commission's authority. Applications for rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end shall be governed by general rules which the commission may establish. In case a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end is granted the proceedings shall conform as nearly as may be to the proceedings in an original hearing, except as the commission may otherwise direct. If in the commission's judgment, after the rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end , it shall appear that the original decision, order, or determination is in any respect unlawful or unreasonable, the commission may reverse, change, modify, or suspend the original action accordingly. Any decision, order, or determination made after the rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end reversing, changing, modifying, or suspending the original determination shall have the same force and effect as an original decision, order, or determination. Only one rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end shall be granted by the commission; but this shall not be construed to prevent any party from filing a new application or complaint. No order of the commission shall become effective while an application for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration, new text end or a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration proceeding, new text end is pending and until ten days after the application for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end is either denied, expressly or by implication, or the commission has announced its final determination on rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end . Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.27, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Deadline to grant application. Any application for a rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end not granted within 60 days from the date of filing thereof, shall be deemed denied. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.27, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Effect of decision on application. It is hereby declared that the legislative powers of the state, insofar as they are involved in the issuance of orders and decisions by the commission, have not been completely exercised until the commission has acted upon an application for rehearingnew text begin or reconsiderationnew text end , as provided for by this section and by the rules of the commission, or until the application for rehearing new text begin or reconsideration new text end has been denied by implication, as above provided for. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.43, is amended to read: 216B.43 HEARING ON COMPLAINT. Upon the filing of an application under section 216B.42 or upon complaint by an affected utility that the provisions of sections 216B.39 to 216B.42 have been violated, the commission shall hold a hearing, upon notice, within deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days after the filing of the complaint, and shall render its decision within 30 days after the hearing. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.62, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Supplemental staffing assessment. In addition to other assessments in subdivision 3, the commission may assess up to $800,000 per year for supplemental staffing to implement requirements of this chapter. The amount in this subdivision shall be assessed to the several public utilities in proportion to their respective gross operating revenues from retail sales of gas or electric service within the state during the last calendar year and shall be deposited into an account in the special revenue fundnew text begin and appropriated to the commissionnew text end . An assessment made under this subdivision is not subject to the cap on assessments provided in subdivision 3 or any other law. Sec. 23. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 216B.1681; 216B.1695; and 216B.2412, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07709 216B.1681 CURTAILMENT PAYMENTS. The commission shall conduct a study of curtailment payments for wind energy projects to assess whether utilities are unduly discriminating among project ownership structures in regard to the contractual availability of curtailment payments. The commission shall submit the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with primary jurisdiction over energy policy by January 15, 2008. 216B.1695 ENVIRONMENTAL PROJECTS; ADVANCE DETERMINATION OF PRUDENCE. Subdivision 1. Qualifying project. A public utility may petition the commission for an advance determination of prudence for a project undertaken to comply with federal or state air quality standards of states in which the utility's electric generation facilities are located, if the project has an expected jurisdictional cost to Minnesota ratepayers of at least $10,000,000. A project is undertaken to comply with federal or state air quality standards if it is required: (1) by the state in which the generation facility is located in a state implementation plan, permit, or order; or (2) to comply with section 111 or 112 of the federal Clean Air Act, United States Code, title 42, section 7411 or 7412. Subd. 2. Regulatory cost assessments and reports. (a) A utility requesting an advance determination under subdivision 1 must, as part of the evidence required when filing a petition under subdivision 3, provide to the Public Utilities Commission and the Pollution Control Agency an assessment of all anticipated state and federal environmental regulations related to the production of electricity from the utility's facility subject to the filing, including regulations relating to: (1) air pollution by nitrogen oxide and sulphur dioxide, including an assumption that Minnesota will be included in the federal Clean Air Interstate Rule region, hazardous air pollutants, carbon dioxide, particulates, and ozone; (2) coal waste; and (3) water consumption and water pollution. (b) In addition, the utility shall provide an assessment of the financial and operational impacts of these pending regulations applicable to the generating facility that is the subject of the filing and provide a range of regulatory response scenarios that include, but are not limited to: (1) the installation of pollution control equipment; (2) the benefits of the retirement or repowering of the plant that is the subject of the filing with cleaner fuels considering the costs of complying with state and federal environmental regulations; and (3) the use of pollution allowances to achieve compliance. (c) The utility shall consult with interested stakeholders in establishing the scope of the regulatory, financial, and operational assessments prior to or during the 60-day period of the notice under subdivision 4. Subd. 3. Petition. A petition filed under this section must include a description of the project, evidence supporting the project's reasonableness, a discussion of project alternatives, a project implementation schedule, a cost estimate and support for the reasonableness of the estimated cost, and a description of the public utility's efforts to ensure the lowest reasonable costs. Following receipt of the Pollution Control Agency's verification under subdivision 4, the commission shall allow opportunity for oral and written comment on the petition. The commission shall make a final determination on the petition within ten months of its filing date. The commission must make findings in support of its determination. Subd. 4. Verification. At least 60 days prior to filing a petition to the commission under subdivision 3, the utility shall file notice with the Pollution Control Agency that describes the project and how it qualifies under subdivision 1. The Pollution Control Agency shall, within 60 days of receipt of the notice, verify that the project qualifies under subdivision 1, and shall forward written verification to the commission. Subd. 5. Cost recovery. The utility may begin recovery of costs that have been incurred by the utility in connection with implementation of the project in the next rate case following an advance determination of prudence or in a rider approved under section 216B.1692. The commission shall review the costs incurred by the utility for the project. The utility must show that the project costs are reasonable and necessary, and demonstrate its efforts to ensure the lowest reasonable project costs. Notwithstanding the commission's prior determination of prudence, it may accept, modify, or reject any of the project costs. The commission may determine whether to require an allowance for funds used during construction offset. Subd. 5a. Rate of return. The return on investment in the rider shall be at the level approved by the commission in the public utility's last general rate case, unless the commission determines that a different rate of return is in the public interest. Subd. 6. Expiration. A petition for an advance determination of prudence may not be filed after December 31, 2015. 216B.2412 DECOUPLING OF ENERGY SALES FROM REVENUES. Subd. 3. Pilot programs. The commission shall allow one or more rate-regulated utilities to participate in a pilot program to assess the merits of a rate-decoupling strategy to promote energy efficiency and conservation. Each pilot program must utilize the criteria and standards established in subdivision 2 and be designed to determine whether a rate-decoupling strategy achieves energy savings. On or before a date established by the commission, the commission shall require electric and gas utilities that intend to implement a decoupling program to file a decoupling pilot plan, which shall be approved or approved as modified by the commission. A pilot program may not exceed three years in length. Any extension beyond three years can only be approved in a general rate case, unless that decoupling program was previously approved as part of a general rate case.